Tennessee statutes. Title 22 Juries And Jurors
Chapter 3

Examination and Challenge of Jurors

22-3-101. Absolute right of parties to examine.

Parties in civil and criminal cases or their attorneys shall have an absolute right to examine prospective jurors in such cases, notwithstanding any rule of procedure or practice of court to the contrary.

Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 3, §§ 22-3-101 — 22-3-105 (Code 1858, §§ 4009 (deriv. Const. 1834, art. 1, §§ 6, 9), 4010 (deriv. Acts 1805, ch. 60, § 1; 1843-1844, ch. 134, § 3), 4012 (deriv. Acts 1805, ch. 60, § 1); Acts 1879, ch. 108; impl. am. Acts 1883, ch. 198, § 1; Shan., §§ 5820–5822, 5824; Code 1932, §§ 10015-10017, 10019; Acts 1955, ch. 281, § 1; 1965, ch. 31, §§ 1, 2; 1968, ch. 608, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 22-301 — 22-304; Acts 1977, ch. 100, § 1; T.C.A., § 22-501), concerning examination and challenge of furors, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1, effective January 1, 2009.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 25.47.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 1-47.01-1.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Jury, §§ 2, 21, 30.

Law Reviews.

A Survey of Civil Procedure in Tennessee — 1977, V. Trial Procedure (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 347.

What Jurors Want to Know: Motivating Juror Cognition to Increase Legal Knowledge & Improve Decisionmaking, 81 Tenn. L. Rev. 752 (2014).

Comparative Legislation. Examination of jurors:

Ala. R.C.P. 47(a).

Ark. Code § 16-33-101 et seq; § 16-33-201 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. § 15-12-131 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 29A.290.

Miss. Code Ann. § 13-5-69.

Mo. Rev. Stat. §§ 494.465 — 494.480.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 9-15.

Va. Code § 8.01-358.

Cited: State v. Odom, — S.W.3d —, 2010 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 223 (Tenn. Crim. App. Mar. 4, 2010); State v. Graves, — S.W.3d —, 2011 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 91 (Tenn. Crim. App. Feb. 8, 2011); Cole v. State, — S.W.3d —, 2011 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 186 (Tenn. Crim. App. Mar. 8, 2011); State v. Climer, — S.W.3d —, 2011 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 914 (Tenn. Crim. App. Dec. 14, 2011).

22-3-102. Challenge for general causes of incompetency.

Either party to an action may challenge for cause any person presented as a petit juror, in either a civil or criminal proceeding, who is incompetent to act as a juror under chapter 1 of this title or who has completed a jury service term in any court of this state within the previous twenty-four (24) months.

Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 3, §§ 22-3-101 — 22-3-105 (Code 1858, §§ 4009 (deriv. Const. 1834, art. 1, §§ 6, 9), 4010 (deriv. Acts 1805, ch. 60, § 1; 1843-1844, ch. 134, § 3), 4012 (deriv. Acts 1805, ch. 60, § 1); Acts 1879, ch. 108; impl. am. Acts 1883, ch. 198, § 1; Shan., §§ 5820–5822, 5824; Code 1932, §§ 10015-10017, 10019; Acts 1955, ch. 281, § 1; 1965, ch. 31, §§ 1, 2; 1968, ch. 608, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 22-301 — 22-304; Acts 1977, ch. 100, § 1; T.C.A., § 22-501), concerning examination and challenge of furors, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1, effective January 1, 2009.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Jury, §§ 20-23, 32.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 189.

Rethinking Independence: The Lack of an Effective Remedy for Improper For-Cause Removals (Tracey A. Hardin), 50 Vand. L. Rev. 197 (1997).

22-3-103. Challenge for adverse interest.

Either party to an action may challenge for cause any person who has an adverse interest in a similar suit involving like questions of facts or involving the same parties.

Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 3, §§ 22-3-101 — 22-3-105 (Code 1858, §§ 4009 (deriv. Const. 1834, art. 1, §§ 6, 9), 4010 (deriv. Acts 1805, ch. 60, § 1; 1843-1844, ch. 134, § 3), 4012 (deriv. Acts 1805, ch. 60, § 1); Acts 1879, ch. 108; impl. am. Acts 1883, ch. 198, § 1; Shan., §§ 5820–5822, 5824; Code 1932, §§ 10015-10017, 10019; Acts 1955, ch. 281, § 1; 1965, ch. 31, §§ 1, 2; 1968, ch. 608, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 22-301 — 22-304; Acts 1977, ch. 100, § 1; T.C.A., § 22-501), concerning examination and challenge of furors, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1, effective January 1, 2009.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), §§ 25.45, 25.54.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Jury, §§ 22-24, 32.

Law Reviews.

Selecting A Trial Jury In Tennessee, 22 Tenn. L. Rev. 220.

The Tennessee Court Systems — The Jury System, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 489.

22-3-104. Peremptory challenges — Effect of consolidation of cases.

Either party to a civil action may challenge four (4) jurors without assigning any cause.

In the event there is more than one (1) party plaintiff or more than one (1) party defendant in a civil action, four (4) additional challenges shall be allowed to such side or sides of the case; and the trial court shall, in its discretion, divide the aggregate number of challenges between the parties on the same side, which shall not exceed eight (8) challenges to the side, regardless of the number of parties. Even when two (2) or more cases are consolidated for trial purposes, the total challenges shall be eight (8), as provided in this subsection (b).

If a party is both a plaintiff and a defendant, that party is considered one (1) party for the purpose of this section.

Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 3, §§ 22-3-101 — 22-3-105 (Code 1858, §§ 4009 (deriv. Const. 1834, art. 1, §§ 6, 9), 4010 (deriv. Acts 1805, ch. 60, § 1; 1843-1844, ch. 134, § 3), 4012 (deriv. Acts 1805, ch. 60, § 1); Acts 1879, ch. 108; impl. am. Acts 1883, ch. 198, § 1; Shan., §§ 5820–5822, 5824; Code 1932, §§ 10015-10017, 10019; Acts 1955, ch. 281, § 1; 1965, ch. 31, §§ 1, 2; 1968, ch. 608, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 22-301 — 22-304; Acts 1977, ch. 100, § 1; T.C.A., § 22-501), concerning examination and challenge of furors, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1, effective January 1, 2009.

Cross-References. Civil actions, right of trial by jury, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 38.

Criminal actions, peremptory challenges, Tenn. R. Crim. P. 24.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Jury, § 35.

Law Reviews.

Cross-Sectionalism in Jury-Selection Procedures After Taylor v. Louisiana (Martha Craig Daughtrey), 43 Tenn. L. Rev. 1.

Jury Reform in Tennessee, 34 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1 (2003).

The All-New Civil Semi-Peremptory Jury Challenge (André Kahn Blumstein), 28 Tenn. B.J. 27 (1992).